District of Columbia statutes.
13-433

Individuals to be served; special cases.

When the law of the District of Columbia requires that in order to effect service one or more designated individuals be served, service outside the District of Columbia under this article must be made upon such designated individual or individuals.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-433.
1973 Ed., § 13-433.